Hawaii, session 2025, SB1314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 134-9.6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§134-9.6[]]  Annual report on licenses to carry.  (a) [No later than April 1, 2024, and April 1 of each year thereafter, the] The department of the attorney general shall publish [a] an annual report on its publicly available website that includes, if available: (1)  The number of licenses to carry applied for, issued, revoked, and denied, further categorized by the age, gender, race, and county of residence of each applicant or licensee; (2)  The specific reasons for each revocation and denial; (3)  Analysis of denials based on applicants' failure to meet the standards of section 134-9(d), and recommendations to remedy any disparities in denial rates by age, gender, or race; (4)  The number of appeals and appeals granted; and (5)  The number of violations of section 134-9.1. (b)  No later than [February 1] March 31 of each year, the chief of police of each county shall [supply] provide to the department of the attorney general [with] the data for the prior calendar year that the department requires to complete the report under subsection (a)." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________ BY REQUEST